South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S892.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 29, Title 6 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 6-29-1230. (A) The court may award the applicant and/or property owner whose application was approved by the planning commission, board of zoning appeals, board of architectural review, or a similar body the reasonable attorney's fees and costs incurred to defend the decision in appellate proceedings brought pursuant to this chapter. The applicant and/or property owner is presumptively entitled to recover his fees and costs from an appellant or appellants if the court dismisses such appeal or if the decision is not reversed on appeal. (B) An applicant and/or property owner is not entitled to recover under this Section in any appeal of a decision granting an application for a special exception. (C) In no event shall the amount awarded exceed the fees that the applicant and/or property owner contracted to pay counsel for work relating to the appeal. Attorney's fees shall be limited to a reasonable time expended at a reasonable rate. Factors to be applied in determining a reasonable rate include: (1) the nature, extent, and difficulty of the case; (2) the time devoted; (3) the professional standing of counsel; (4) the beneficial results obtained; and (5) the customary legal fees for similar services. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----